apertium-pol.pol.dix
<pardef n="Bytom__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ia</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iowi</l>      <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iem</l>       <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iu</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iu</l>        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Tosz/ek__np">
  <e>       <p><l>ek</l>        <r>ek<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ka</l>        <r>ek<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kowi</l>      <r>ek<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ek</l>        <r>ek<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>kiem</l>      <r>ek<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ku</l>        <r>ek<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ku</l>        <r>ek<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Sosnow/iec__np">
  <e>       <p><l>iec</l>       <r>iec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ca</l>        <r>iec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cowi</l>      <r>iec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iec</l>       <r>iec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cem</l>       <r>iec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cu</l>        <r>iec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>cu</l>        <r>iec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Lubli/niec__np">
  <e>       <p><l>niec</l>      <r>niec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ńca</l>       <r>niec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ńcowi</l>     <r>niec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>niec</l>      <r>niec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ńcem</l>      <r>niec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ńcu</l>       <r>niec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ńcu</l>       <r>niec<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Częstochow/a__np">
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ę</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ą</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie</l>        <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>a<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Zabrz/e__np">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>em</l>        <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Ole/sno__np">
  <e>       <p><l>sno</l>       <r>sno<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sna</l>       <r>sno<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>snu</l>       <r>sno<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sno</l>       <r>sno<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>snem</l>      <r>sno<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>śnie</l>      <r>sno<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sno</l>       <r>sno<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Rud/a_Śląska__np">
  <e>       <p><l>a<b/>Śląska</l><r>a<b/>Śląska<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y<b/>Śląskiej</l><r>a<b/>Śląska<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zie<b/>Śląskiej</l><r>a<b/>Śląska<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ę<b/>Śląską</l><r>a<b/>Śląska<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ą<b/>Śląską</l><r>a<b/>Śląska<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zie<b/>Śląskiej</l><r>a<b/>Śląska<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o<b/>Śląska</l><r>a<b/>Śląska<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Dąbrow/a_Górnicza__np">
  <e>       <p><l>a<b/>Górnicza</l><r>a<b/>Górnicza<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>y<b/>Górniczej</l><r>a<b/>Górnicza<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie<b/>Górniczej</l><r>a<b/>Górnicza<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ę<b/>Górniczą</l><r>a<b/>Górnicza<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ą<b/>Górniczą</l><r>a<b/>Górnicza<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ie<b/>Górniczej</l><r>a<b/>Górnicza<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o<b/>Górnicza</l><r>a<b/>Górnicza<s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Częstochowa">     <i>Częstochow</i><par n="Częstochow/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Sosnowiec">       <i>Sosnow</i><par n="Sosnow/iec__np"/></e>
<e lm="Zabrze">          <i>Zabrz</i><par n="Zabrz/e__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bytom">           <i>Bytom</i><par n="Bytom__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ruda Śląska">     <i>Rud</i><par n="Rud/a_Śląska__np"/></e>
<e lm="Dąbrowa Górnicza"><i>Dąbrow</i><par n="Dąbrow/a_Górnicza__np"/></e>
<e lm="Zawiercie">       <i>Zawierci</i><par n="Zabrz/e__np"/></e>
<e lm="Żywiec">          <i>Żyw</i><par n="Sosnow/iec__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pszczyna">        <i>Pszczyn</i><par n="Częstochow/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Lubliniec">       <i>Lubli</i><par n="Lubli/niec__np"/></e>
<e lm="Orzesze">         <i>Orzesz</i><par n="Zabrz/e__np"/></e>
<e lm="Toszek">          <i>Tosz</i><par n="Tosz/ek__np"/></e>
<e lm="Byczyna">         <i>Byczyn</i><par n="Częstochow/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Głogówek">        <i>Głogów</i><par n="Tosz/ek__np"/></e>
<e lm="Nysa">            <i>Nys</i><par n="Częstochow/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Olesno">          <i>Ole</i><par n="Ole/sno__np"/></e>
<e lm="Opole">           <i>Opol</i><par n="Zabrz/e__np"/></e>
<e lm="Koźle">           <i>Koźl</i><par n="Zabrz/e__np"/></e>
<e lm="Ozimek">          <i>Ozim</i><par n="Tosz/ek__np"/></e>
<e lm="Karwina">         <i>Karwin</i><par n="Częstochow/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Orłowa">          <i>Orłow</i><par n="Częstochow/a__np"/></e>
<e lm="Trzyniec">        <i>Trzy</i><par n="Lubli/niec__np"/></e>
